Nevada, session 83, AB170.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161, the
Board may issue a limited license for a person to practice
medicine as an associate physician if the applicant:
1. Has received the degree of doctor of medicine from a
medical school in the United States or Canada:
(a) Approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education
of the American Medical Association and Association of American
Medical Colleges; or
(b) Which provides a course of professional instruction
equivalent to that provided in medical schools in the United States
approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education;
2. Has passed the Step 1 Exam and Step 2 CK Exam of the
United States Medical Licensing Examination or an examination
deemed equivalent by the Board;
3. Has not completed a residency in a program described in
sub-subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 630.160;
4. Has completed at least his or her first year of postgraduate
medical education as a resident or intern as part of a program
that:
(a) Has been approved by the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education;
(b) Conforms to the minimum standards for intern training
established by the American Osteopathic Association; or
(c) Is approved by the Board in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to section 9 of this act; and
5. Has basic fluency in the English language.
Sec. 3. 1. An associate physician shall only practice
medicine under the supervision and control of a physician:
(a) Who meets the requirements of section 5 of this act; and
-
*AB170*

– 4 –
(b) With whom the associate physician has entered into a
collaborative practice agreement that meets the requirements of
section 6 of this act.
2. An associate physician shall not practice medicine in a
manner that exceeds the skill, training and competence of the
associate physician or his or her supervising physician.
3. For the first 30 days during which an associate physician
practices medicine under the supervision of a new supervising
physician, the supervising physician must be physically present on
the same premises and available to assist the associate physician.
4. An associate physician shall not practice medicine in a
county whose population is less than 100,000 unless the
supervising physician or another physician designated by the
supervising physician is physically present on the same premises
and is available to assist the associate physician.
5. An associate physician working in a rural health clinic, as
defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(2), shall be considered to be a
physician assistant for the purposes of the regulations of the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services. Such an associate
physician and his or her supervising physician are not required to
comply with the requirements of any regulations adopted pursuant
to section 9 of this act governing the supervision of an associate
physician that are more stringent than the requirements of federal
law and regulations.
6. A person or entity that employs an associate physician
shall credential the associate physician and bill for services
rendered by the associate physician in the same manner as the
person or entity credentials and bills for the services of a physician
assistant.
Sec. 4. 1. The supervising physician of an associate
physician shall prominently display a disclosure at every office
where the associate physician practices medicine explaining to
patients that the patient may be seen by an associate physician and
the patient may instead request to be seen by the supervising
physician.
2. An associate physician shall clearly identify himself or
herself as an associate physician, including, without limitation, by
wearing an identification badge that clearly identifies the person
as an associate physician. An associate physician may identify
himself or herself as a doctor.
3. While acting as the supervising physician of an associate
physician, a physician shall wear an identification badge that
clearly identifies the person as a supervising physician of an
associate physician.
-
*AB170*

– 5 –
Sec. 5. 1. A physician shall not serve as the supervising
physician of an associate physician pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 3 of this act or the designee of a supervising physician
pursuant to subsection 4 of section 3 of this act unless the
physician:
(a) Holds an active unrestricted license to practice medicine in
this State; and
(b) Practices in the same specialty area as the associate
physician or a substantially similar specialty area as the associate
physician.
2. The supervising physician of an associate physician:
(a) Is responsible for any act that constitutes the practice of
medicine by the associate physician;
(b) Must have insurance that includes coverage for any claim
of malpractice against the associate physician; and
(c) May not enter into a collaborative practice agreement with
more than three associate physicians.
3. The Board may not deny, revoke or suspend the license of
or take any other disciplinary action against the supervising
physician of an associate physician for any act performed by the
associate physician that:
(a) Is performed in accordance with the collaborative practice
agreement entered into pursuant to section 3 of this act; and
(b) Does not violate applicable federal, state or local laws or
the regulations of the Board.
Sec. 6. 1. A collaborative practice agreement entered into
pursuant to section 3 of this act must be in writing and must
include, without limitation:
(a) The names, home and business addresses and telephone
numbers of the supervising physician and associate physician;
(b) A list of each location where the associate physician may
practice medicine, including, without limitation, the prescribing
and dispensing of controlled substances;
(c) Any specialty or board certification held by the supervising
physician;
(d) Any certification held by the associate physician;
(e) Requirements governing collaboration between the
supervising physician and the associate physician, including,
without limitation:
(1) The geographic proximity which must exist between the
supervising physician and the associate physician while the
associate physician is practicing medicine; and
(2) A plan for alternative supervision if the supervising
physician is absent, incapacitated or otherwise unavailable;
-
*AB170*

– 6 –
(f) Any controlled substance the supervising physician
authorizes the associate physician to prescribe or dispense in
accordance with section 7 of this act;
(g) The procedure by which the supervising physician will
review the standard of care the associate physician is providing to
patients, which must comply with the regulations adopted
pursuant to section 9 of this act;
(h) The duration of the collaborative practice agreement; and
(i) A statement of any other collaborative practice agreements
into which:
(1) The supervising physician has entered with another
associate physician; and
(2) The associate physician has entered with another
supervising physician.
2. Upon entering into a new collaborative practice agreement
with an associate physician, a supervising physician shall file with
the Board:
(a) A copy of the agreement; and
(b) Proof that any controlled substance included in the
agreement pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection 1 is within the
skill, training and competence of the associate physician and his
or her supervising physician to prescribe and dispense.
3. A supervising physician or associate physician may
terminate a collaborative practice agreement or a relationship with
a supervising physician or an associate physician, as applicable, at
any time. Any provision of a collaborative practice agreement or
any other agreement that limits the authority of a supervising
physician or an associate physician to terminate a collaborative
practice agreement or such a relationship is void.
Sec. 7. 1. An associate physician may prescribe or dispense
the controlled substances listed in subsection 2 under the
conditions prescribed by this section if the associate physician:
(a) Is registered with the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
NRS 639.1373;
(b) Has entered into a collaborative practice agreement
pursuant to section 3 of this act authorizing the associate
physician to prescribe the controlled substance; and
(c) Meets all other requirements prescribed by federal and
state law to prescribe controlled substances.
2. Subject to the limitations prescribed in NRS 639.1373, an
associate physician who meets the requirements of subsection 1
may prescribe or dispense:
(a) Any controlled substance listed in schedule III, IV or V;
and
-
*AB170*

– 7 –
(b) Any controlled substance listed in schedule II that contains
hydrocodone.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
associate physician shall not prescribe or dispense more than a 5-
day supply of a controlled substance listed in schedule II or III.
An associate physician may prescribe or dispense a 30-day supply
of buprenorphine for the treatment of a substance use disorder
under the direction of his or her supervising physician.
4. An associate physician shall not prescribe or dispense
controlled substances unless:
(a) The supervising physician of the associate physician is
physically present on the same premises; or
(b) The associate physician has, at any time, completed 120
hours practicing medicine over a period of not more than 4
months with his or her supervising physician physically present on
the same premises.
Sec. 8. 1. A limited license to practice medicine as an
associate physician issued pursuant to section 2 of this act expires
2 years after it is issued.
2. The Board may renew a limited license to practice
medicine as an associate physician upon application by the
associate physician. An application for renewal must include,
without limitation, proof that the associate physician has actually
engaged in the practice of medicine under a collaborative practice
agreement entered into pursuant to section 3 of this act during the
immediately preceding 2 years.
Sec. 9. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations necessary:
(a) To carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of
this act, including, without limitation:
(1) Any additional requirements for the issuance or
renewal of a limited license to practice medicine as an associate
physician.
(2) The standards for the approval of programs of
postgraduate medical education pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 4 of section 2 of this act.
(3) The required fees for the issuance and renewal of such
a license.
(4) Standards of practice for associate physicians,
including, without limitation, limitations on the practice of
medicine by an associate physician in addition to those prescribed
by sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act.
(5) Any additional requirements governing collaborative
practice agreements entered into pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(6) Requirements concerning the supervision of an
associate physician by a supervising physician, including, without
-
*AB170*

– 8 –
limitation, requirements governing the review by the supervising
physician of the standard of care the associate physician is
providing to patients. Such regulations must not be more stringent
than any similar requirements that apply to physician assistants.
(b) For an associate physician to be eligible to work in a clinic
that receives federal funding.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section and NRS
630.253 must not require an associate physician to complete a
greater amount of continuing education than a physician licensed
pursuant to NRS 630.160.
3. The Board shall publish on the Internet website
maintained pursuant to NRS 630.144 the name of each associate
physician and the physician or physicians supervising the
associate physician.
Sec. 10. NRS 630.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.025 “Supervising physician” means an active physician
licensed and in good standing in the State of Nevada who supervises
a physician assistant [.] or an associate physician.
Sec. 11. NRS 630.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.160 1. Every person desiring to practice medicine must,
before beginning to practice, procure from the Board a license
authorizing the person to practice.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.1605 to 630.161,
inclusive, and 630.258 to 630.2665, inclusive, and sections 2 to 9,
inclusive, of this act, a license may be issued to any person who:
(a) Has received the degree of doctor of medicine from a
medical school:
(1) Approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical
Education of the American Medical Association and Association of
American Medical Colleges; or
(2) Which provides a course of professional instruction
equivalent to that provided in medical schools in the United States
approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education;
(b) Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties and who agrees to maintain the
certification for the duration of the licensure, or has passed:
(1) All parts of the examination given by the National Board
of Medical Examiners;
(2) All parts of the Federation Licensing Examination;
(3) All parts of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination;
(4) All parts of a licensing examination given by any state or
territory of the United States, if the applicant is certified by a
specialty board of the American Board of Medical Specialties;
-
*AB170*

– 9 –
(5) All parts of the examination to become a licentiate of the
Medical Council of Canada; or
(6) Any combination of the examinations specified in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) that the Board determines to be
sufficient;
(c) Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties in the specialty of emergency
medicine, preventive medicine or family medicine and who agrees
to maintain certification in at least one of these specialties for the
duration of the licensure, or:
(1) Has completed 36 months of progressive postgraduate:
(I) Education as a resident in the United States or Canada
in a program approved by the Board, the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education, the Royal College of Physicians and
Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des médecins du Québec or the
College of Family Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their
successor organizations; or
(II) Fellowship training in the United States or Canada
approved by the Board or the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education;
(2) Has completed at least 36 months of postgraduate
education, not less than 24 months of which must have been
completed as a resident after receiving a medical degree from a
combined dental and medical degree program approved by the
Board; or
(3) Is a resident who is enrolled in a progressive postgraduate
training program in the United States or Canada approved by the
Board, the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education,
the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, the
Collège des médecins du Québec or the College of Family
Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their successor
organizations, has completed at least 24 months of the program and
has committed, in writing, to the Board that he or she will complete
the program; and
(d) Passes a written or oral examination, or both, as to his or her
qualifications to practice medicine and provides the Board with a
description of the clinical program completed demonstrating that the
applicant’s clinical training met the requirements of paragraph (a).
3. The Board may issue a license to practice medicine after the
Board verifies, through any readily available source, that the
applicant has complied with the provisions of subsection 2. The
verification may include, but is not limited to, using the Federation
Credentials Verification Service. If any information is verified by a
source other than the primary source of the information, the Board
-
*AB170*

– 10 –
may require subsequent verification of the information by the
primary source of the information.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, if, after issuing a license to practice medicine, the Board
obtains information from a primary or other source of information
and that information differs from the information provided by the
applicant or otherwise received by the Board, the Board may:
(a) Temporarily suspend the license;
(b) Promptly review the differing information with the Board as
a whole or in a committee appointed by the Board;
(c) Declare the license void if the Board or a committee
appointed by the Board determines that the information submitted
by the applicant was false, fraudulent or intended to deceive the
Board;
(d) Refer the applicant to the Attorney General for possible
criminal prosecution pursuant to NRS 630.400; or
(e) If the Board temporarily suspends the license, allow the
license to return to active status subject to any terms and conditions
specified by the Board, including:
(1) Placing the licensee on probation for a specified period
with specified conditions;
(2) Administering a public reprimand;
(3) Limiting the practice of the licensee;
(4) Suspending the license for a specified period or until
further order of the Board;
(5) Requiring the licensee to participate in a program to
correct an alcohol or other substance use disorder;
(6) Requiring supervision of the practice of the licensee;
(7) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000;
(8) Requiring the licensee to perform community service
without compensation;
(9) Requiring the licensee to take a physical or mental
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice medicine;
(10) Requiring the licensee to complete any training or
educational requirements specified by the Board; and
(11) Requiring the licensee to submit a corrected application,
including the payment of all appropriate fees and costs incident to
submitting an application.
5. If the Board determines after reviewing the differing
information to allow the license to remain in active status, the action
of the Board is not a disciplinary action and must not be reported to
any national database. If the Board determines after reviewing the
differing information to declare the license void, its action shall be
-
*AB170*

– 11 –
deemed a disciplinary action and shall be reportable to national
databases.
Sec. 12. NRS 630.267 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.267 1. Each holder of a license to practice medicine for
which the procedure for renewal is not otherwise prescribed by
specific statute must, on or before June 30, or if June 30 is a
Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, on the next business day after
June 30, of each odd-numbered year:
(a) Submit a list of all actions filed or claims submitted to
arbitration or mediation for malpractice or negligence against him or
her during the previous 2 years.
(b) Pay to the Secretary-Treasurer of the Board the applicable
fee for biennial registration. This fee must be collected for the
period for which a physician is licensed.
(c) Submit a list of the names of each associate physician
supervised by the holder of the license, if applicable.
(d) Submit all information required to complete the biennial
registration.
2. When a holder of a license fails to pay the fee for biennial
registration and submit all information required to complete the
biennial registration after they become due, his or her license to
practice medicine in this State expires. The holder may, within 2
years after the date the license expires, upon payment of twice the
amount of the current fee for biennial registration to the Secretary-
Treasurer and submission of all information required to complete
the biennial registration and after he or she is found to be in good
standing and qualified under the provisions of this chapter, be
reinstated to practice.
3. Not later than 60 days before a license is scheduled to
expire, the Board shall make such reasonable attempts as are
practicable to notify the licensee:
(a) At least once that the fee for biennial registration and all
information required to complete the biennial registration are due;
and
(b) The date on which his or her license is scheduled to expire.
4. After a license expires, the Board shall make such
reasonable attempts as are practicable to notify the holder of the
license that his or her license has expired.
5. Not later than September 30 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall provide a list of licenses to practice medicine that have
expired during that year to the Drug Enforcement Administration of
the United States Department of Justice or its successor agency and
the State Board of Pharmacy.
-
*AB170*

– 12 –
Sec. 13. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14 to 21, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 14. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 633.315, the
Board may issue a limited license for a person to practice
osteopathic medicine as an associate osteopathic physician if the
applicant:
1. Has received the degree of doctor of osteopathic medicine
from a medical school in the United States approved by the
Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation of the
American Osteopathic Association;
2. Has passed the Level 1 Exam and Level 2 CE Exam of the
Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination of
the United States of the National Board of Osteopathic Medical
Examiners, the Step 1 Exam and Step 2 CK Exam of the United
States Medical Licensing Examination or an examination deemed
equivalent by the Board;
3. Has not completed a residency in a program described in
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 633.311;
4. Has completed at least his or her first year of postgraduate
medical education as a resident or intern as part of a program
that:
(a) Conforms to the minimum standards for intern training
established by the American Osteopathic Association;
(b) Has been approved by the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education; or
(c) Is approved by the Board in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to section 21 of this act; and
5. Has basic fluency in the English language.
Sec. 15. 1. An associate osteopathic physician shall only
practice osteopathic medicine under the supervision and control of
an osteopathic physician:
(a) Who meets the requirements of section 17 of this act; and
(b) With whom the associate osteopathic physician has entered
into a collaborative practice agreement that meets the
requirements of section 18 of this act.
2. An associate osteopathic physician shall not practice
osteopathic medicine in a manner that exceeds the skill, training
and competence of the associate osteopathic physician or his or
her supervising osteopathic physician.
3. For the first 30 days during which an associate osteopathic
physician practices osteopathic medicine under the supervision of
a new supervising osteopathic physician, the supervising
osteopathic physician must be physically present on the same
-
*AB170*

– 13 –
premises and available to assist the associate osteopathic
physician.
4. An associate osteopathic physician shall not practice
osteopathic medicine in a county whose population is less than
100,000 unless the supervising osteopathic physician or another
osteopathic physician designated by the supervising osteopathic
physician is physically present on the same premises and available
to assist the associate osteopathic physician.
5. An associate osteopathic physician working in a rural
health clinic, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(2), shall be
considered to be a physician assistant for the purposes of the
regulations of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of
the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
Such an associate osteopathic physician and his or her
supervising osteopathic physician are not required to comply with
the requirements of any regulations adopted pursuant to section
21 of this act governing the supervision of an associate osteopathic
physician that are more stringent than the requirements of federal
law and regulations.
6. A person or entity that employs an associate osteopathic
physician shall credential the associate osteopathic physician and
bill for services rendered by the associate osteopathic physician in
the same manner as the person or entity credentials and bills for
the services of a physician assistant.
Sec. 16. 1. The supervising osteopathic physician of an
associate osteopathic physician shall prominently display a
disclosure at every office where the associate osteopathic
physician practices osteopathic medicine explaining to patients
that the patient may be seen by an associate osteopathic physician
and the patient may instead request to be seen by the supervising
osteopathic physician.
2. An associate osteopathic physician shall clearly identify
himself or herself as an associate osteopathic physician, including,
without limitation, by wearing an identification badge that clearly
identifies the person as an associate osteopathic physician. An
associate osteopathic physician may identify himself or herself as
a doctor.
3. While acting as the supervising osteopathic physician of an
associate osteopathic physician, an osteopathic physician shall
wear an identification badge that clearly identifies the person as a
supervising osteopathic physician of an associate osteopathic
physician.
Sec. 17. 1. An osteopathic physician shall not serve as the
supervising osteopathic physician of an associate osteopathic
physician pursuant to subsection 1 of section 15 of this act or the
-
*AB170*

– 14 –
designee of a supervising osteopathic physician pursuant to
subsection 4 of section 15 of this act unless the osteopathic
physician:
(a) Holds an active unrestricted license to practice osteopathic
medicine in this State;
(b) Practices in the same specialty area as the associate
osteopathic physician or a substantially similar specialty area as
the associate osteopathic physician; and
(c) Normally provides care to patients.
2. The supervising osteopathic physician of an associate
osteopathic physician:
(a) Is responsible for any act that constitutes the practice of
osteopathic medicine by the associate osteopathic physician;
(b) Must have insurance that includes coverage for any claim
of malpractice against the associate osteopathic physician; and
(c) May not enter into a collaborative practice agreement with
more than three associate osteopathic physicians.
3. The Board may not deny, revoke or suspend the license of
or take any other disciplinary action against the supervising
osteopathic physician of an associate osteopathic physician for
any act performed by the associate osteopathic physician that:
(a) Is performed in accordance with the collaborative practice
agreement entered into pursuant to section 15 of this act; and
(b) Does not violate applicable federal, state or local laws or
the regulations of the Board.
Sec. 18. 1. A collaborative practice agreement entered into
pursuant to section 15 of this act must be in writing and must
include, without limitation:
(a) The names, home and business addresses and telephone
numbers of the supervising osteopathic physician and associate
osteopathic physician;
(b) A list of each location where the associate osteopathic
physician may practice osteopathic medicine, including, without
limitation, the prescribing and dispensing of controlled
substances;
(c) Any specialty or board certification held by the supervising
osteopathic physician;
(d) Any certification held by the associate osteopathic
physician;
(e) Requirements governing collaboration between the
supervising osteopathic physician and the associate osteopathic
physician, including, without limitation:
(1) The geographic proximity which must exist between the
supervising osteopathic physician and the associate osteopathic
-
*AB170*

– 15 –
physician while the associate osteopathic physician is practicing
osteopathic medicine; and
(2) A plan for alternative supervision if the supervising
osteopathic physician is absent, incapacitated or otherwise
unavailable;
(f) Any controlled substance the supervising osteopathic
physician authorizes the associate osteopathic physician to
prescribe or dispense in accordance with section 19 of this act;
(g) The procedure by which the supervising osteopathic
physician will review the standard of care the associate
osteopathic physician is providing to patients, which must comply
with the regulations adopted pursuant to section 21 of this act;
(h) The duration of the collaborative practice agreement; and
(i) A statement of any other collaborative practice agreements
into which:
(1) The supervising osteopathic physician has entered with
another associate osteopathic physician; and
(2) The associate osteopathic physician has entered with
another supervising osteopathic physician.
2. Upon entering into a new collaborative practice agreement
with an associate osteopathic physician, a supervising osteopathic
physician shall file with the Board:
(a) A copy of the agreement; and
(b) Proof that any controlled substance included in the
agreement pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection 1 is within the
skill, training and competence of the associate osteopathic
physician and his or her supervising osteopathic physician to
prescribe and dispense.
3. A supervising osteopathic physician or associate
osteopathic physician may terminate a collaborative practice
agreement or a relationship with a supervising osteopathic
physician or an associate osteopathic physician, as applicable, at
any time. Any provision of a collaborative practice agreement or
any other agreement that limits the authority of a supervising
osteopathic physician or an associate osteopathic physician to
terminate a collaborative practice agreement or such a
relationship is void.
Sec. 19. 1. An associate osteopathic physician may
prescribe or dispense the controlled substances listed in subsection
2 under the conditions prescribed by this section if the associate
osteopathic physician:
(a) Is registered with the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
NRS 639.1373;
-
*AB170*

– 16 –
(b) Has entered into a collaborative practice agreement
pursuant to section 15 of this act authorizing the associate
osteopathic physician to prescribe the controlled substance; and
(c) Meets all other requirements prescribed by federal and
state law to prescribe controlled substances.
2. Subject to the limitations prescribed in NRS 639.1373, an
associate osteopathic physician who meets the requirements of
subsection 1 may prescribe or dispense:
(a) Any controlled substance listed in schedule III, IV or V;
and
(b) Any controlled substance listed in schedule II that contains
hydrocodone.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
associate osteopathic physician shall not prescribe or dispense
more than a 5-day supply of a controlled substance listed in
schedule II or III. An associate osteopathic physician may
prescribe or dispense a 30-day supply of buprenorphine for the
treatment of a substance use disorder under the direction of his or
her supervising osteopathic physician.
4. An associate osteopathic physician shall not prescribe or
dispense controlled substances unless:
(a) The supervising osteopathic physician of the associate
osteopathic physician is physically present on the same premises;
or
(b) The associate osteopathic physician has, at any time,
completed 120 hours practicing osteopathic medicine over a period
of not more than 4 months with his or her supervising osteopathic
physician physically present on the same premises.
Sec. 20. 1. A limited license to practice osteopathic
medicine as an associate osteopathic physician issued pursuant to
section 14 of this act expires 2 years after it is issued.
2. The Board may renew a limited license to practice
osteopathic medicine as an associate osteopathic physician upon
application by the associate osteopathic physician. An application
for renewal must include, without limitation, proof that the
associate osteopathic physician has actually engaged in the
practice of osteopathic medicine under a collaborative practice
agreement entered into pursuant to section 15 of this act during
the immediately preceding 2 years.
Sec. 21. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations necessary:
(a) To carry out the provisions of sections 14 to 21, inclusive,
of this act, including, without limitation:
(1) Any additional requirements for the issuance or
renewal of a limited license to practice osteopathic medicine as an
associate osteopathic physician.
-
*AB170*

– 17 –
(2) The standards for the approval of programs of
postgraduate medical education pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 4 of section 14 of this act.
(3) The required fees for the issuance and renewal of such
a license.
(4) Standards of practice for associate osteopathic
physicians, including, without limitation, limitations on the
practice of osteopathic medicine by an associate osteopathic
physician in addition to those prescribed by sections 14 to 21,
inclusive, of this act.
(5) Any additional requirements governing collaborative
practice agreements entered into pursuant to section 15 of this act.
(6) Requirements concerning the supervision of an
associate osteopathic physician by a supervising osteopathic
physician, including, without limitation, requirements governing
the review by the supervising osteopathic physician of the standard
of care the associate osteopathic physician is providing to patients.
Such regulations must not be more stringent than any similar
requirements that apply to physician assistants.
(b) For an associate osteopathic physician to be eligible to
work in a clinic that receives federal funding.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section and NRS
633.471 must not require an associate osteopathic physician to
complete a greater amount of continuing education than an
osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to NRS 633.311.
3. The Board shall publish on an Internet website maintained
by the Board the name of each associate osteopathic physician and
the osteopathic physician or osteopathic physicians supervising
the associate osteopathic physician.
Sec. 22. NRS 633.123 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.123 “Supervising osteopathic physician” means an
osteopathic physician who is licensed in this State, is in good
standing with the Board and [supervises] :
1. Supervises a physician assistant with Board approval [.] ; or
2. Supervises an associate osteopathic physician.
Sec. 23. NRS 633.311 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.311 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 633.315
and 633.381 to 633.419, inclusive, and sections 14 to 21, inclusive,
of this act, an applicant for a license to practice osteopathic
medicine may be issued a license by the Board if:
(a) The applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(b) The applicant is a graduate of a school of osteopathic
medicine;
(c) The applicant:
-
*AB170*

– 18 –
(1) Has graduated from a school of osteopathic medicine
before 1995 and has completed:
(I) A hospital internship; or
(II) One year of postgraduate training that complies with
the standards of intern training established by the American
Osteopathic Association;
(2) Has completed 3 years, or such other length of time as
required by a specific program, of postgraduate medical education
as a resident in the United States or Canada in a program approved
by the Board, the Bureau of Professional Education of the American
Osteopathic Association or the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education; or
(3) Is a resident who is enrolled in a postgraduate training
program in this State, has completed 24 months of the program and
has committed, in writing, that he or she will complete the program;
(d) The applicant applies for the license as provided by law;
(e) The applicant passes:
(1) All parts of the licensing examination of the National
Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners;
(2) All parts of the licensing examination of the Federation
of State Medical Boards;
(3) All parts of the licensing examination of the Board, a
state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and is certified by a specialty board of the American
Osteopathic Association or by the American Board of Medical
Specialties; or
(4) A combination of the parts of the licensing examinations
specified in subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) that is approved by the
Board;
(f) The applicant pays the fees provided for in this chapter; and
(g) The applicant submits all information required to complete
an application for a license.
2. An applicant for a license to practice osteopathic medicine
may satisfy the requirements for postgraduate education or training
prescribed by paragraph (c) of subsection 1:
(a) In one or more approved postgraduate programs, which may
be conducted at one or more facilities in this State or, except for a
resident who is enrolled in a postgraduate training program in this
State pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1,
in the District of Columbia or another state or territory of the United
States;
(b) In one or more approved specialties or disciplines;
(c) In nonconsecutive months; and
(d) At any time before receiving his or her license.
-
*AB170*

– 19 –
Sec. 24. NRS 633.467 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.467 An osteopathic physician who does not normally
provide care to patients may not be [a] the supervising osteopathic
physician [.] of a physician assistant.
Sec. 25. NRS 633.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.471 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 15 ,
[and] NRS 633.491 [,] and section 20 of this act, every holder of a
license, except a physician assistant or an anesthesiologist assistant,
issued under this chapter, except a temporary or a special license,
may renew the license on or before January 1 of each calendar year
after its issuance by:
(a) Applying for renewal on forms provided by the Board;
(b) Paying the annual license renewal fee specified in this
chapter;
(c) Submitting a list of all actions filed or claims submitted to
arbitration or mediation for malpractice or negligence against the
holder during the previous year;
(d) Subject to subsection 14, submitting evidence to the Board
that in the year preceding the application for renewal the holder has
attended courses or programs of continuing education approved by
the Board in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board
totaling a number of hours established by the Board which must not
be less than 35 hours nor more than that set in the requirements for
continuing medical education of the American Osteopathic
Association; [and]
(e) Submitting a list of the names of each associate osteopathic
physician supervised by the holder, if applicable; and
(f) Submitting all information required to complete the renewal.
2. The Secretary of the Board shall notify each licensee of the
requirements for renewal not less than 30 days before the date of
renewal.
3. The Board shall request submission of verified evidence of
completion of the required number of hours of continuing medical
education annually from a percentage of the applicants for renewal
of a license to practice osteopathic medicine or a license to practice
as a physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant determined by
the Board. Subject to subsection 14, upon a request from the Board,
an applicant for renewal of a license to practice osteopathic
medicine or a license to practice as a physician assistant or
anesthesiologist assistant shall submit verified evidence satisfactory
to the Board that in the year preceding the application for renewal
the applicant attended courses or programs of continuing medical
education approved by the Board totaling the number of hours
established by the Board.
-
*AB170*

– 20 –
4. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to complete a course of instruction within 2
years after initial licensure that provides at least 2 hours of
instruction on evidence-based suicide prevention and awareness as
described in subsection 9.
5. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice osteopathic medicine to receive, as a portion of his or her
continuing education, training concerning methods for educating
patients about how to effectively manage medications, including,
without limitation, the ability of the patient to request to have the
symptom or purpose for which a drug is prescribed included on the
label attached to the container of the drug.
6. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice osteopathic medicine or as a physician assistant to receive,
as a portion of his or her continuing education, training and
education in the diagnosis of rare diseases, including, without
limitation:
(a) Recognizing the symptoms of pediatric cancer; and
(b) Interpreting family history to determine whether such
symptoms indicate a normal childhood illness or a condition that
requires additional examination.
7. The Board shall require, as part of the continuing education
requirements approved by the Board, the biennial completion by a
holder of a license to practice osteopathic medicine of at least 2
hours of continuing education credits in ethics, pain management,
care of persons with addictive disorders or the screening, brief
intervention and referral to treatment approach to substance use
disorder.
8. The continuing education requirements approved by the
Board must allow the holder of a license as an osteopathic
physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant to receive
credit toward the total amount of continuing education required by
the Board for the completion of a course of instruction relating to
genetic counseling and genetic testing.
9. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to receive as a portion of his or her continuing
education at least 2 hours of instruction every 4 years on evidence-
based suicide prevention and awareness which may include, without
limitation, instruction concerning:
(a) The skills and knowledge that the licensee needs to detect
behaviors that may lead to suicide, including, without limitation,
post-traumatic stress disorder;
(b) Approaches to engaging other professionals in suicide
intervention; and
-
*AB170*

– 21 –
(c) The detection of suicidal thoughts and ideations and the
prevention of suicide.
10. A holder of a license to practice osteopathic medicine may
not substitute the continuing education credits relating to suicide
prevention and awareness required by this section for the purposes
of satisfying an equivalent requirement for continuing education in
ethics.
11. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to complete at least 2 hours of training in the
screening, brief intervention and referral to treatment approach to
substance use disorder within 2 years after initial licensure.
12. The Board shall require each psychiatrist or a physician
assistant practicing under the supervision of a psychiatrist to
biennially complete one or more courses of instruction that provide
at least 2 hours of instruction relating to cultural competency and
diversity, equity and inclusion. Such instruction:
(a) May include the training provided pursuant to NRS 449.103,
where applicable.
(b) Must be based upon a range of research from diverse
sources.
(c) Must address persons of different cultural backgrounds,
including, without limitation:
(1) Persons from various gender, racial and ethnic
backgrounds;
(2) Persons from various religious backgrounds;
(3) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and questioning
persons;
(4) Children and senior citizens;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons with a mental illness;
(7) Persons with an intellectual disability, developmental
disability or physical disability; and
(8) Persons who are part of any other population that a
psychiatrist or physician assistant practicing under the supervision
of a psychiatrist may need to better understand, as determined by the
Board.
13. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine or as a physician assistant who provides or
supervises the provision of emergency medical services in a hospital
or primary care to complete at least 2 hours of training in the stigma,
discrimination and unrecognized bias toward persons who have
acquired or are at a high risk of acquiring human immunodeficiency
virus within 2 years after beginning to provide or supervise the
provision of such services or care.
-
*AB170*

– 22 –
14. The Board shall not require a physician assistant to receive
or maintain certification by the National Commission on
Certification of Physician Assistants, or its successor organization,
or by any other nationally recognized organization for the
accreditation of physician assistants to satisfy any continuing
education requirement pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 and
subsection 3.
15. Members of the Armed Forces of the United States and the
United States Public Health Service are exempt from payment of the
annual license renewal fee during their active duty status.
16. As used in this section, “primary care” means the practice
of family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and
gynecology and midwifery.
Sec. 26. NRS 639.1373 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.1373 1. A physician assistant or an associate physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS may, if authorized
by the Board, possess, administer, prescribe or dispense controlled
substances, or possess, administer, prescribe or dispense poisons,
dangerous drugs or devices in or out of the presence of his or her
supervising physician only to the extent and subject to the
limitations specified in the registration certificate issued to the
physician assistant or associate physician by the Board pursuant to
this section.
2. Each physician assistant and associate physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS who is authorized by his or
her physician assistant’s or associate physician’s license issued by
the Board of Medical Examiners or by the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine, respectively, to possess, administer,
prescribe or dispense controlled substances, or to possess,
administer, prescribe or dispense poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices must apply for and obtain a registration certificate from the
Board, pay a fee to be set by regulations adopted by the Board and
pass an examination administered by the Board on the law relating
to pharmacy before the physician assistant or associate physician
can possess, administer, prescribe or dispense controlled substances,
or possess, administer, prescribe or dispense poisons, dangerous
drugs or devices.
3. The Board shall consider each application separately and
may, even though the physician assistant’s or associate physician’s
license issued by the Board of Medical Examiners or by the State
Board of Osteopathic Medicine authorizes the physician assistant or
associate physician to possess, administer, prescribe or dispense
controlled substances, or to possess, administer, prescribe or
dispense poisons, dangerous drugs and devices:
(a) Refuse to issue a registration certificate;
-
*AB170*

– 23 –
(b) Issue a registration certificate limiting the authority of the
physician assistant or associate physician to possess, administer,
prescribe or dispense controlled substances, or to possess,
administer, prescribe or dispense poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices, the area in which the physician assistant or associate
physician may possess controlled substances, poisons, dangerous
drugs and devices, or the kind and amount of controlled substances,
poisons, dangerous drugs and devices; or
(c) Issue a registration certificate imposing other limitations or
restrictions which the Board feels are necessary and required to
protect the health, safety and welfare of the public.
4. If the registration of the physician assistant or associate
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS is
suspended or revoked, the physician’s controlled substance
registration may also be suspended or revoked.
5. The Board shall adopt regulations controlling the maximum
amount to be administered, possessed and dispensed, and the
storage, security, recordkeeping and transportation of controlled
substances and the maximum amount to be administered, possessed,
prescribed and dispensed and the storage, security, recordkeeping
and transportation of poisons, dangerous drugs and devices by
physician assistants and associate physicians licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS. In the adoption of those regulations, the
Board shall consider, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) The area in which the physician assistant or associate
physician is to operate;
(b) The population of that area;
(c) The experience and training of the physician assistant [;] or
associate physician;
(d) The distance to the nearest hospital and physician; and
(e) The effect on the health, safety and welfare of the public.
6. For the purposes of this section [, the] :
(a) The term “associate physician” includes an associate
osteopathic physician.
(b) The term “supervising physician” includes a supervising
osteopathic physician as defined in chapter 633 of NRS.
Sec. 27. NRS 0.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
0.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
“physician” means a person who engages in the practice of
medicine, including osteopathy and homeopathy.
2. The terms “physician,” “associate physician,” “osteopathic
physician,” “associate osteopathic physician,” “homeopathic
physician,” “chiropractic physician” and “podiatric physician” are
used in chapters 630, 630A, 633, 634 and 635 of NRS in the limited
senses prescribed by those chapters respectively.
-
*AB170*

– 24 –
Sec. 28. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 27, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB170*